West Virginia, session 2026, HB4227.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. Authorization for OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5B-1. Office of Inspector General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-64-7 of this code, modified by the Office of Inspector General to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 23, 2025, relating to the Office of Inspector General (syringe services program licensure, 71 CSR 24), is authorized.